Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Chapter 45. Unclaimed Property.

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS

34.45.010

—

34.45.080

provide a museum with the ability to dispose of unclaimed objects in the museum collection.
AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

allow the state to sell, destroy, or otherwise dispose of abandoned personal property. Feb. 27, 1996, Op. Att’y Gen.